src/fst/morphology/stems/determiners.lexc
!! # Tokelau determiners

!! Documentation: NP overview:
!! 1. (preposition) -> in prepositions.lexc
!! 2. determiner -> Determiners
!! 3. (possessive pronoun)
!! 4. (premodifier)
!! 5. nucleus
!! 6. (postmodifier)
!! 7. (demonstrative)

LEXICON  Nominal-modifiers
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 
 Premodifiers ;   ! +Pcle+Pre
 Determiners ;    ! +Det / +Det+Dem
 Postmodifiers ;  ! +Pcle+Post
 Demonstratives ; ! +Dem


LEXICON Premodifiers
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 
mātuā pre "very big" ;
tamā pre "very small" ;
tamakī pre  "very small" ;
tamakīkī pre  "very small" ;
toe pre "final, last, leftover" ;

LEXICON pre ! rather +Det+Pre, or only +Det ?
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 
+Pcle+Pre: # ;


LEXICON Determiners
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 

! +/- specific, +/- plural, -Det must be pre/N
te+Det+Def+Sg:te # ;
he+Det+Indef+Sg:he # ;
nā+Det+Def+Pl:nā # ;
ni+Det+Indef+Pl:ni # ;

tētahi+Det+Indef+Sg:tētahi # ;
tetahi+Det+Indef+Sg:tetahi # ;
hetahi+Det+Indef+Sg:hetahi # ;
hetahi+Det+Indef+Sg:hētahi # ; ! xxx error? 255 x hētahi in Bible
iētahi+Det+Indef+Pl:iētahi # ;

a+Dem:a # ;

!! -Dem may occur both pre-N and post-N:
!! before N they function as Det, after N they
!! must have another Det as support. (taimi = time)
!! tēnei taimi, te taimi tēnei

!! ## pre-nominal
!! sg
tēnei+Det+Dem+Prox:tēnei # ; ! 1
tēnā+Det+Dem+Med:tēnā # ;    ! 2
tēia+Det+Dem+Dist:tēia # ;   ! 3

!! unspecified for number
nei+Det+Dem+Prox:nei # ;
nā+Det+Dem+Med:nā # ;
ia+Det+Dem-Dist:ia # ; 

!! pl
iēnei+Det+Dem+Pl+Prox:iēnei # ;
iēnā+Det+Dem+Sg+Med:iēnā # ;
iēia+Det+Dem+Pl+Dist:iēia # ;



!! ## Possessors


!! ### Singular reference

haku+Det+Poss+Sg1+Sg:haku # ;
hoku+Det+Poss+Sg1+Sg+Indef:hoku # ;
hata+Det+Poss+Sg1+Sg+Emph:hata # ; ! Special form which conveys an appeal for sympathy or pity.
hau+Det+Poss+Sg2+Sg:hau # ;
hō+Det+Poss+Sg2+Sg:hoo # ;
tō+Det+Poss+Sg2+Sg:too # ;
ōu+Det+Poss+Sg2+Sg:oou # ;
hana+Det+Poss+Sg3+Sg:hana # ;
tana+Det+Poss+Sg3+Sg:tana # ;
tata+Det+Poss+Sg3+Sg+Emph:tata # ;

!! du1
au+Det+Poss+Du2+Sg:au # ;
haulua+Det+Poss+Du2+Sg:haulua # ;
ha% lāua+Det+Poss+Du3+Sg:ha% lāua # ;
ho% lāua+Det+Poss+Du3+Sg+Indef:ho% lāua # ;

!! pl1
hautou+Det+Poss+Pl2+Sg:hautou # ;
houtou+Det+Poss+Pl2+Sg:houtou # ;
ha% lātou+Det+Poss+Pl3+Sg:ha% laatou # ;
ho% lātou+Det+Poss+Pl3+Sg:ho% laatou # ;


!! ### Plural reference

ata+Det+Poss+Sg1+Pl:ata # ;
ō+Det+Poss+Sg2+Pl:oo # ;
ana+Det+Poss+Sg3+Pl:ana # ;
ona+Det+Poss+Sg3+Pl:ona # ;

!! du1
outou+Det+Poss+Du2+Pl:outou # ;
aulua+Det+Poss+Du2+Pl:aulua # ; !2nd person dual possessive pronominal adjective, definite, class-A
oulua+Det+Poss+Du2+Pl:oulua # ; !2nd person dual possessive pronominal adjective, definite, class-O
!du3

!! pl1
ha% mātou+Det+Poss+Pl1+Excl+Sg:ha% mātou # ; ! 1st person plural exclusive possessive pronom inal adjective, in­ definite, class-A, with singular reference.
autou+Det+Poss+Pl2+Pl:autou # ;
outou+Det+Poss+Pl2+Pl:outou # ;
!! pl3
!! TODO

!! # System should be:
!! - particles before / after N
!! - particles before / after V

!! - proximal or first person (objects near to the speaker),
!! - medial or second person (objects near to the addressee),
!! - distal or third person


LEXICON Demonstratives
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 

!! post-nominal
!! sg
tēnei+Dem+Prox:tēnei # ; ! 1
tēnā+Dem+Med:tēnā # ;    ! 2
tēia+Dem+Dist:tēia # ;   ! 3

!! unspecified for number
nei+Dem+Prox:nei # ;
nā+Dem+Med:nā # ;
ia+Dem-Dist:ia # ; 

!! pl
iēnei+Dem+Pl+Prox:iēnei # ;
iēnā+Dem+Sg+Med:iēnā # ;
iēia+Dem+Pl+Dist:iēia # ;

tē+Dem:tē # ; ! in use only postnominally
iē+Dem:iē # ; ! in use only postnominally




LEXICON Postmodifiers ! rather +Dem+Emph ?
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 
lele post "very" ;
lava post "emph" ;

LEXICON post
!!≈ __@LEXNAME@__ 
+Pcle+Post: # ;
